Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 13

County Fiscal Procedure Law of 1957

5-13-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “County Fiscal Procedure Law of 1957.”

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1301.

Cross-References. County financial management system, title 5, ch. 21.

5-13-102. Local approval.

This chapter shall be local in effect and shall become effective in a particular county upon the contingency of a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body or other governing body of the county approving this law, or upon the contingency of the majority of the voters casting votes in any election held for this purpose approving this law.

The procedure for elections held for the purpose of approving this law shall be that the county election commission shall call and conduct an election within thirty (30) days after receiving a petition signed by ten percent (10%) of the qualified voters of the county stating that they favor this law and requesting that an election be held in the county on the subject.

The number of qualified voters in the county is deemed to be the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor in the last general election, or upon a resolution of the county legislative body or other governing body, duly certified to the election commission, requesting such an election.

In such an election, the propositions to be voted upon shall be stated on the ballot on separate lines in the following manner: “For the County Fiscal Procedure Law of 1957” and “Against the County Fiscal Procedure Law of 1957.”

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1302.

5-13-103. Director of accounts and budgets — Appointment — Compensation — Staff.

The county mayor of any county that has adopted this part shall appoint, with the approval of the county legislative body or other governing body, a director of accounts and budgets who shall be a county employee.

The director of accounts and budgets shall be qualified by training and experience in the field of accounting to perform the director's duties in a proficient manner and in accordance with generally recognized principles of governmental accounting.

Before assuming the director's duties the director shall execute a corporate surety bond, the amount of which shall be established by the county mayor at not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

The bond shall be prepared in accordance with title 8, chapter 19, approved by the county legislative body, recorded in the office of the county register of deeds and transmitted to the office of the county clerk for safekeeping.

The premium for such bond shall be paid from the county general fund.

The compensation of the director, which shall not be in excess of compensation allowed county officials in accordance with §§ 8-24-101 and 8-24-102, shall be set annually by the county legislative body or other governing body of the county.

The amount of such compensation, the compensation of such stenographers, typists or assistants as the director may need, and the other necessary expenses of the director's office shall be provided for by annual appropriation from the county general fund.

The director has the power, in accordance with such regulations as may be established from time to time by the county mayor, to appoint and remove the director's assistants, to prescribe their duties, and to fix their salaries within the limits of the annual appropriation.

In any county having a population of not less than thirty-eight thousand six hundred (38,600) nor more than thirty-eight thousand seven hundred (38,700), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the director shall not be terminated or discharged without the approval of the county legislative body.

This subsection (f) shall not apply in any county that has a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 101, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1303; Acts 1998, ch. 677, § 3; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2013, ch. 315, §§ 11, 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended subsection (c), shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-13-104. Fiscal procedure system.

There shall be set up and maintained in the office of the director of accounts and budgets a system of fiscal procedure, control and centralized accounting, set out and described in this section, which shall be under the administrative control and direction of the director; but such system shall be conducted in full accordance with the general law of this state respecting the duties and responsibilities of the county mayor as fiscal agent of the county.

The system of fiscal procedure, control and accounting provided for in this section shall conform to generally accepted principles of governmental accounting and shall be in substantial agreement with the recommendations of the national committee on governmental accounting.

The system shall include such records and procedures as may be required to accurately reflect the assets, liabilities, income and expenditures of each fund of the county, together with such records, accounts and files as are necessary to record and control:

The transactions relating to county revenues, and the revenues for each of its several funds;

The transactions relating to the adopted budget and appropriations, including the expenditures and encumbrances against each item of appropriations;

The transactions relating to the bonded debt; and

Such other records as may be necessary to facilitate the operation of the adopted budget and the proper accounting for each item of county expenditure.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1304; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. County mayor as county financial officer, §§ 5-6-108 — 5-6-110, 5-6-112.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-13-105. Director of accounts and budgets — Accounting duties generally.

It is the duty of the director of accounts and budgets to:

Post and otherwise keep the records of the central accounting system;

Verify all bills, invoices, payrolls and claims against the county before payment; and

Check the settlements and reports of the various officials and department heads of the county government.

The director shall also, after careful preaudit of invoices, bills and claims against the county or any of its funds, prepare disbursement warrants on all county funds.

It is the duty of such director to sign all county disbursement warrants as evidence of such director's audit and approval of the expenditure made thereby, but no disbursement warrant drawn on the county trustee shall become a county liability payable by the county trustee until such warrant shall also have been signed by the county mayor, county director of schools, or other official or officials whose signatures are required on such warrants.

The director shall install, with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury, a uniform classification of accounts, including a classification of revenues and expenditures, to be used in accounting, budgeting and financial reporting respecting all county funds, offices, agencies and activities of the county governments, with the exception of school funds administered by the county board of education and the county director of schools, and shall prescribe the forms to be used by each official and employee of the county in connection therewith.

The classification of expenditures and receipts of county school funds shall conform to the classification of accounts as prescribed by the commissioner of education.

The director shall set up and maintain a double entry system of accounting for recording the transactions of all of the county's funds, including both proprietary and budgetary accounts, in conformity with the requirements set out in § 5-13-104.

The accounts shall be kept on the modified cash basis.

The director shall set up the necessary accounts to properly record the annual budget and each appropriation made by the county legislative body.

All encumbrances, expenditures or other charges against any item of the budget shall be promptly recorded in order that the unencumbered balance of each item of the budget shall be readily ascertainable at all times.

At the end of each month, the director shall prepare a comprehensive report of all revenues and expenditures of the county and of each of its several funds, departments, offices, agencies and activities, all encumbrances against the several appropriations, and the condition of each item of appropriation in the annual budget.

The most recent of such reports shall be presented to the county legislative body at each quarterly meeting and copies of such reports shall be furnished the members thereof.

The director shall preaudit all payrolls of the county before payment and shall maintain complete earnings records of each employee of the county.

The director and the county mayor are hereby authorized to maintain a special county payroll account at a local bank at the county seat, in which disbursement warrants for the total of each payroll may be deposited and against which individual net earning checks may be issued to each of the county employees.

The county mayor may authorize the issuance of such payroll checks on the signature of the director, and in such event the depository bank shall be so instructed.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 5; 1961, ch. 276, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1305; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 3.

5-13-106. Receipt of funds.

Excepting taxes such as the county trustee is authorized to collect, the payment of all moneys to the county trustee by any collectors authorized by statute, or by anyone on account due the county, shall be made only by issuance of a receivable warrant signed by the county mayor instructing the trustee to receive the amount named, for which the trustee shall issue a receipt, a duplicate of which shall be delivered to the director of accounts and budgets to be used by the director in posting the accounting records.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1306; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-13-107. Disbursement of funds.

Before any obligation against the county shall be paid or any disbursement warrant or voucher issued therefor, a detailed invoice or statement approved by the head of the office, department or agency for which the obligation was made shall be filed with the director of accounts and budgets.

The director shall make a careful preaudit of such invoice or statement, including a comparison with any encumbrance document previously posted or filed authorizing such obligation, and shall approve for payment only such items as appear to be correct, properly authorized, and not exceeding the otherwise unencumbered balance of the allotments or appropriations against which they are chargeable.

Disbursement warrants shall be promptly prepared for all such approved items by the director and mailed or delivered to the payees thereof.

A duplicate copy of all disbursement warrants, with all original invoices or other supporting documents, or both, attached to the duplicate copies, shall be kept on file in the office of the director.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 7; T.C.A., § 5-1307.

Cross-References. Preparation of disbursement warrant by director, § 5-13-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 3.

5-13-108. Agency reports and information.

Each official, office, department, institution, agency, board, committee, commission or employee of the county shall furnish such information and make such reports as may be required to properly maintain the central accounting system and fiscal procedures herein authorized and prescribed, and such information and reports shall be furnished at such times and in such form as may be prescribed by the director of accounts and budgets.

The records of all county offices, departments and agencies shall be made available by their respective officials or employees for examination at all reasonable hours by the director.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 8; T.C.A., § 5-1308.

5-13-109. Violations — Penalties.

Any official named in this chapter, or any other official, agent or employee of the county who fails or refuses to perform the duties required of that official, agent or employee under this chapter, or who otherwise fails or refuses to conform to this chapter, commits a Class C misdemeanor and is subject to removal from office.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 9; T.C.A., § 5-1309; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

5-13-110. Application to schools, etc.

This chapter shall not apply to county school funds for any purpose, the county board of education, and the county director of schools unless approved by the commissioner of education.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 9A; T.C.A., § 5-1310.

5-13-111. Construction of chapter.

This chapter is not exclusive and shall not prevent the adoption of amendments to existing special or local laws pertaining to fiscal procedure, control and accounting, or the enactment of special or local acts creating central accounting systems, fiscal procedures, and offices of director of accounts and budgets.

Acts 1957, ch. 313, § 10; T.C.A., § 5-1311.